Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1534
Sale of lands and chattels; printer's fees to be advanced; effect of noncompliance.

The officer who levies upon goods and chattels, or lands and tenements, or who is charged with the duty of selling the same by virtue of any writ or execution, may refuse to publish a notice of the sale thereof by advertisement in a newspaper until the party for whose benefit such execution issued, his agent or attorney, shall advance to such officer so much money as will be sufficient to discharge the fees of the printer for publishing such notice.

R.S.1867, Code § 501, p. 479;

R.S.1913, § 8080;

C.S.1922, § 9016;

C.S.1929, § 20-1534;

R.S.1943, § 25-1534.